Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB503.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of exempting from state and local property taxes the
permanent residence of an owner who is an active duty member or an honorably
discharged veteran of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Reserve Forces,
or the Kentucky National Guard by amending the Constitution of Kentucky to read as
stated below?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
There shall be exempt from taxation real property maintained as the permanent
residence of an owner who is:
(1) An active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States
Reserve Forces, or the Kentucky National Guard; or
(2) A veteran with an honorable discharge from the United States Armed
Forces, the United States Reserve Forces, or the Kentucky National Guard.
To receive an exemption under this section, the owner shall file with the
appropriate local assessor by December 31 of the taxation period, on forms provided
therefor, a signed statement, made under penalty of perjury, indicating his or her active
duty status or receipt of an honorable discharge. The exemptions in this section are
provided notwithstanding contrary provisions of Sections 170, 171, 172, and 174 of this
Constitution.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and under Sections 4
and 5 of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1472
Secretary of State shall cause the question in Section 1 of this Act and the entirety of the
proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section 2 of this Act
to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in this
state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the same manner the
fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their acceptance or rejection at
the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be voted for.
The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415 shall be made no later than the
first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the complete text of Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall have
the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots
provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting machines in
use in each county or precinct.
Section 6. If the exemption created by the proposed amendment to the
Constitution of Kentucky in Section 2 of this Act is ratified by the voters of the
Commonwealth, it shall only apply to real property assessed on or after January 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:45 PM Jacketed